Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Voluntary Dissolution.

§79-4-14.01.
Dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date of its incorporation;

Either (i) that none of the corporation’s shares has been issued, or (ii) that the corporation has not commenced business;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.01 eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Disposition of assets in the cause of dissolution under this article not governed by § 79-4-12.02, disposition of assets requiring shareholder approval, see § 79-4-12.02.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

Dissolving or winding up affairs of corporation domiciled in another state. 19 A.L.R.3d 1279.

What amounts to “oppressive” conduct under statute authorizing dissolution of corporation at suit of minority stockholders.
56 A.L.R.3d 358.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2348 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1684 et seq.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-14.02.
Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and

The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (e).

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) require a greater vote, a greater number of shares to be present, or a vote by voting groups, adoption of the proposal to dissolve shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast exists.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.02; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment deleted “in accordance with Section 79-4-7.05” following “shareholders’ meeting” in (d); and rewrote (e).

Filing of notice to adopt articles of dissolution pursuant to this section as affecting elective buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation shares of which are not listed or regularly traded, see § 79-4-14.34.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

Although it is the general rule that there is no legal dissolution or surrender of the charter of a nonstock corporation until so decreed pursuant to this section [Code 1942, § 5352], a court of equity may in a proper case treat the corporation as dissolved, even though in a legal sense no dissolution has occurred, and a dissolution may be implied as by consent of all the members when the meetings are voluntarily discontinued and activity of members of such comes to an end.
Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows v. Poole, 190 Miss. 798, 1 So. 2d 780, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 98 (Miss. 1941).

An agreement between the existing members of a local lodge of a fraternal society to abandon the lodge as such and to discontinue its corporate functions, to divide up the personal property, together with an arrangement to rent the property and share in the rent thereof, was effective to determine the status of the parties thereto as tenants in common as would have been their status after formal surrender, notwithstanding there was no legal dissolution. Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows v. Poole, 190 Miss. 798, 1 So. 2d 780, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 98 (Miss. 1941).

Under the law and pursuant to the notice to creditors if any there were, one would be entitled, if in fact he was a creditor, to appear and establish his claim and have the same fixed as a charge against the assets of the corporation in the hands of such persons to whom the same would pass upon a dissolution thereof. Ex parte Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows, 186 Miss. 490, 191 So. 89, 1939 Miss. LEXIS 227 (Miss. 1939).

A demurrer by an alleged creditor confessed the allegation of fact in a petition to dissolve a corporation to the effect that there were no debts owing by the corporation and that hence there were no creditors. Ex parte Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows, 186 Miss. 490, 191 So. 89, 1939 Miss. LEXIS 227 (Miss. 1939).

One alleging to be a creditor of a corporation seeking dissolution was not entitled to bring into issue by demurrer the allegation of the petition for dissolution that there were no debts, nor could such one challenge the legal sufficiency of the petition as to whether certain persons were alone entitled to share in the corporate assets as the sole remaining stockholders without first obtaining leave of the court, upon a proper showing, to intervene as a party, or to appear as amicus curiae. Ex parte Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows, 186 Miss. 490, 191 So. 89, 1939 Miss. LEXIS 227 (Miss. 1939).

An agreement for the merger of corporations was not invalid merely because it did not contain any reference to preference to preferred shareholders of the corporation being acquired, since, assuming that all preferred shareholders were opposed to dissolution, it could be fairly implied by the terms of the agreement that they would be paid their interest in cash as dissenting shareholders, as required by Mississippi law. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 319 F. Supp. 1176, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10081 (N.D. Miss. 1970).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2360 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1684 et seq.

§79-4-14.03.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date dissolution was authorized; and

If dissolution was approved by the shareholders, a statement that the proposal to dissolve was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act and by the articles of incorporation.

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

For purposes of this subarticle, “dissolved corporation” means a corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.03; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 26; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2000 amendment rewrote (a)(3); and deleted former (a)(4).

The 2001 amendment added (c).

Requirement that articles of revocation of dissolution set forth the information required by this section, see § 79-4-14.04.

Filing of notice to adopt articles of dissolution pursuant to this section as affecting elective buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, see § 79-4-14.34.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

§79-4-14.04.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty (120) days of its effective date.

Revocation of dissolution must be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless that authorization permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors (or incorporators) revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by Section 79-4-14.03(a)(3).

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, revocation of dissolution is effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution are filed.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.04; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment inserted “of” following “revocation by action” in (b); deleted “or (4)” following “Section 79-4-14.03(a)(3)” in (c)(6); and substituted “upon the effective date of the” for “when” in (d).

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

§79-4-14.05.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Prevent transfer of its shares of securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

Subject its directors and officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Article 8;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.05, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of § 79-4-14.05 to corporation which has been administratively dissolved by Secretary of State, see § 79-4-14.21.

Application of § 79-4-14.05 to winding up and liquidation of corporation’s business and affairs after judicial dissolution, see § 79-4-14.33.

Effect of dissolution, according to provisions of § 79-4-14.05, on order directing buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, see § 79-4-14.34.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

Administratively dissolved corporation is not precluded from liquidation under chapter 11 bankruptcy, even if the corporation is not eligible for reinstatement, since Miss. Code. Ann. § 79-4-14.05(a)(5) provides the dissolved corporation broad discretion to wind up and liquidate its business affairs. In re Superior Boat Works, Inc., 438 B.R. 878, 2010 Bankr. LEXIS 2733 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. 2010).

While a corporation had been administratively dissolved and such dissolution occurred prior to a wrongful death action being filed against the corporation, it was still amenable to suit under the authority of Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.05(b)(5). Schustz v. Buccaneer, Inc., 850 So. 2d 209, 2003 Miss. App. LEXIS 637 (Miss. Ct. App. 2003).

A corporate obligor and those who control it may not with impunity dissolve the corporation in a debt avoidance maneuver and cause its assets to be transferred to a new successor corporation. This is so whether the debt arises in contract, quasi-contract, or tort. Where a corporation unsuccessfully sought to avoid liability on a contract with a former shareholder by dissolving the corporation and transferring assets to a newly formed corporation, the shareholder’s rights against the new corporation were limited to the extent that the new corporation acquired assets of the contracting corporation without paying fair value therefor. Morris v. Macione, 546 So. 2d 969, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 319 (Miss. 1989).

When plaintiffs corporation and principal sued defendant supplier, the corporation was properly dismissed because it was administratively dissolved under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.21(b) (2013), so, under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.22(a)(4) (2013), it could not maintain its claim, it did not seek voluntary or judicial dissolution, so it could not maintain its suit to wind up its business, and it was not defending a suit. Wayne Johnson Elec. Inc. v. Robinson Elec. Supply Co., 266 So.3d 643, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 122 (Miss. 2019).

Liability of shareholders, directors, and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution. 72 A.L.R.4th 419.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2348-2351, 2474 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 451 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1727-1741.

§79-4-14.06.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by notifying its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.

The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred:

If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (b) does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.06; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); and inserted “or” at the end of (c)(1).

Effective date of dissolution, see § 79-4-14.03.

Barring of claim of claimant, who did not receive written notice under this section, when corporation publishes notice of its dissolution in newspaper, see § 79-4-14.07.

Applicability of § 79-4-14.06 to corporation which has been administratively dissolved by Secretary of State, see § 79-4-14.21.

Application of § 79-4-14.06 to winding up and liquidation of corporation’s business and affairs after judicial dissolution see § 79-4-14.33.

Effect of dissolution, according to provisions of § 79-4-14.06, on order directing buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, see § 79-4-14.34.

Deposit of assets of dissolved corporation with State Treasurer for safe keeping until creditor, claimant or shareholder furnishes proof of entitlement to such assets, see § 79-4-14.40.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

A corporate obligor and those who control it may not with impunity dissolve the corporation in a debt avoidance maneuver and cause its assets to be transferred to a new successor corporation. This is so whether the debt arises in contract, quasi-contract, or tort. Where a corporation unsuccessfully sought to avoid liability on a contract with a former shareholder by dissolving the corporation and transferring assets to a newly formed corporation, the shareholder’s rights against the new corporation were limited to the extent that the new corporation acquired assets of the contracting corporation without paying fair value therefor. Morris v. Macione, 546 So. 2d 969, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 319 (Miss. 1989).

A products liability action against a dissolved corporation could be maintained where the liability of the defendant was incurred at the time the machine at issue was manufactured and placed on the market. Naugher v. Fox River Tractor Co., 446 F. Supp. 1281, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12435 (N.D. Miss. 1977).

Judgment rendered against road contractor and his foreign corporate surety held not void because when rendered surety had been dissolved and was in hands of receiver. Rawlings v. American Oil Co., 173 Miss. 683, 161 So. 851, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 236 (Miss. 1935).

This section [Code 1942, § 5353] applies to foreign corporations doing business in state, as well as to domestic corporations. Rawlings v. American Oil Co., 173 Miss. 683, 161 So. 851, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 236 (Miss. 1935).

Foreign corporation dissolved in domicile of its origin may be deemed alive in foreign state, so far as to afford remedies to its own citizens against property within its jurisdiction. Rawlings v. American Oil Co., 173 Miss. 683, 161 So. 851, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 236 (Miss. 1935).

Persons asserting claims against corporation after final decree for corporation’s liquidation was entered and liquidator discharged were not required to obtain permission of chancery court to sue corporation, and suit against liquidator was no longer proper. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Claimant who failed to assert tort claim against corporation pursuant to notice given creditors of corporation’s dissolution could, after dissolution distribution to stockholders of assets, and discharge of liquidator, sue corporation for adjudication of merits of claim, preliminary to taking steps against stockholders as distributees of corporation’s assets. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Failure of creditor of corporation receiving notice of dissolution thereof to file claim does not result in canceling or barring claim. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Corporation’s existence as debtor is continued after dissolution only for purposes of suit against it for adjudication of debt or demand upon its merits, and creditor, upon obtaining judgment against corporation, may pursue stockholders to whom corporation’s assets have been distributed. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Express reservation by statute of rights of creditors of corporation after dissolution carries with it necessarily reasonable means for enforcement of rights so preserved. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Statute making “debts” due from corporation a charge upon its property after dissolution includes tort demands. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Liability of shareholders, directors, and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution. 72 A.L.R.4th 419.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2419, 2420, 2450-2458.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 482, 494, 495.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1763-1766, 1772, 1780.

§79-4-14.07.
Unknown claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office is or was located, or in Hinds County if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the dissolved corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within three (3) years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within the lesser of three (3) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice, or any other applicable limitations period established by applicable law:

A claimant who was not given written notice under Section 79-4-14.06;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on;

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim that is not barred by Section 79-4-14.06(c) or subsection (c) of this section may be enforced:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

Except as provided in Section 79-4-14.08(d), if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of the shareholder’s pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to the shareholder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.07; Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 17; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 11; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 34, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (d) by substituting “subsection (c) of this section” for “Section 79-4-14.07(c).” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), inserted “dissolved” preceding “corporation”; in (b)(3), inserted “dissolved” preceding “corporation,” and substituted “three (3) years” for “five (5) years”; in (c), substituted “three (3) years” for “five (5) years”; in (c)(1), substituted “was not given” for “did not receive”; rewrote (d); in (d)(2), inserted “Except as provided in Section 79-4-14.08(d),” and substituted “the shareholder’s” for “his” preceding “pro rata,” “the shareholder” for “him” preceding “in liquidation” and “the shareholder” for “him” following “distributed to.”

The 2004 amendment rewrote (d).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (b)(1).

Applicability of § 79-4-14.07 to corporation that has been administratively dissolved by Secretary of State, see § 79-4-14.21.

Application of § 79-4-14.07 to winding up and liquidation of corporation’s business and affairs after judicial dissolution, see § 79-4-14.33.

Effect of dissolution, according to provisions of § 79-4-14.07, on order directing buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, see § 79-4-14.34.

Deposit of assets of dissolved corporation with State Treasurer for safe keeping until creditor, claimant or shareholder furnishes proof of entitlement to such assets, see § 79-4-14.40.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Liability of shareholders, directors, and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution. 72 A.L.R.4th 419.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2421, 2489-2497.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 491 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1763, 1766, 1772-1780.

§79-4-14.08.
Dissolved corporations — chancery court proceedings for security payment of claims; notice; guardian ad litem; satisfaction of claim.

A dissolved corporation that has published a notice under Section 79-4-14.07 may file an application with the chancery court of the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved corporation, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under Section 79-4-14.07(c).

Within ten (10) days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved corporation to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved corporation.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of such guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved corporation.

Provision by the dissolved corporation for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy the dissolved corporation’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and such claims may not be enforced against a shareholder who received assets in liquidation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 18; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 35, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (a), deleted “(or, if none in this state, its registered office)” preceding “is located” and added “or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” thereafter.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.

§79-4-14.09.
Payment of claims and distribution of assets of dissolved corporations; liability.

Directors shall cause the dissolved corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets to shareholders after payment or provision for claims.

Directors of a dissolved corporation which has disposed of claims under Section 79-4-14.06, 79-4-14.07 or 79-4-14.08 shall not be liable for breach of subsection (a) of this section with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or satisfied under Section 79-4-14.06, 79-4-14.07 or 79-4-14.08.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (b) by substituting “subsection (a) of this section” for “Section 79-4-14.09(a).” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

Liability for unlawful distribution, see § 79-4-8.33.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-333 through 79-11-345.